Utah statutes.
4-31-113.   Restrictions on movement of infected or exposed animals.

(1)  A person who owns or has possession of an animal and knows that the animal is infected with, or has been exposed to, any contagious or infectious disease, may not:

(a)  permit the animal to run at large, or come in contact with, an animal that can be infected; or

(b)  sell, ship, trade, or give away an infected animal without disclosing that the animal is diseased or has been exposed to disease.

(2)  The provisions of this section do not apply to protected wildlife that is:

(a)  living in nature; and

(b)  under the jurisdiction of the Division of Wildlife Resources.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 331, 2012 General Session

